dictionaries/hy/src/hy_AM.dic
ածխացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
աճապարեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ամաչեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ամրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անբախտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անզգամացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անհայտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անմահացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անողոքացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անցկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անցնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
ապախոշորացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ապահովեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ապշեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
առատացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
առնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
ասաց/CHVI
ավտոմատացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
արբեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
արթնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
արմացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բախտավորացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բանեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բարդացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բարկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բեմականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բիրտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բյուրեղացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բռնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բուսցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գազացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գաղթեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գաղութացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գերբնակեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գերտաքացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գինովացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գմփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գոլորշացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գոռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գռգռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գտնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
գտնովի/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
գունեղացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դանդաղեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դառնալ/CHVAVIDEA2G2INLO
դարձել/VAVBVEVI
դեղնեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դիպչել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
դխկդխկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դմբդմբացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դնգդնգացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դողդողացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դրեց/VI
ելնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
եղբայրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
երերացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
երևացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զարզանդուն/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զբաղեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զգուշացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զնգզնգացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զրնգացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
էլեկտրականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
էվակուացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ընդվզեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ընկնել/CHVAVBVDDEA2G2INLO
թանկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թարմացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թեժացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թխկթխկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թշնամացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թռնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
թռչել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
թրթռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թուրքացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ժողովրդականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
իդեալականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
իշացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
իջնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
իրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լացացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լերկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լխլխկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լողացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լրբացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լփլփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խամրեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խեղճացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խլացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խխմեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խնթխնթացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խոժոռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խոնարհեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խոստովանեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խռթխռթացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խռռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խտղտեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծագեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծանոթացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծերացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծլմփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծծեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծնեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծորեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծվծվացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կաթկաթեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կակղեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կայունացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կապտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կատաղի/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կարմրեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կենտրոնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կլիմայավարժեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կմախքացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կոկիկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կոնսերվացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կոշտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կորացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կորչել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
կպնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
կպչել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
կռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կռվացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կսկծեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կրճտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հագեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հագնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
հալեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
համաժողովրդականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
համապատասխանեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հայացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հայրենադարձնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
հանգցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հանրայնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հաշտեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հասարակացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հասնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
հասունացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հավատացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հատկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հարմարեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հեծնել/CHVAVBVDDEA2G2INLO
հեղափոխականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հեռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հիասթափեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հիշեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հղփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հնչունացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հովացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հրաժարեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ձանձրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճաթեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճաքեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճլվստացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճնկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճպճպացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճվացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճութ/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մահմեդականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մասնագիտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մարմանդացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մեկուսացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մեռնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
մեքենայացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
միացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մոբիլիզացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մոտիկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մտնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
մտովի/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
մտցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
յուրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
նեղացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
նիհարեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ննջեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
նստեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
նրբացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շաչեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շիկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շխկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շնչեղացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շոգիացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շվարեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շտապեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շրպպացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շփշփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ոչնչացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չաղացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չլմփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չխկրտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չմփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չպչպացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չրխկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պահածոյացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պառավեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պարեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պետականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պսպղացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պրծնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
պրոլետարացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ջրիկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ռուսականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սասանեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սերտաճեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սիրունացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սովորեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ստորացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սրտմտեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վատացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վերագտնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
վերադարձնել/CHDEINLOVDVE
վերադարձվել/CHDEINLOVDVE
վերակենդանացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վերցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վստահացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
տալ/CHVAVIDEA2ABG2GEINLOPM
տառապեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
տարել/VI
տեղեկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
տեսնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
տնանկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
տվեց/CHVI
ցամաքեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ցնծացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ուժեղացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ունեմ/CHVI
ուռցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փախնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
փայլեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փխրեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փողփողեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փչացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փսփսացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
քարացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
քոչեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
օդընտելացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ֆսֆսացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
